Illinois, session 104th, HB3349.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Powering Up Illinois Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.8    "Electric utility" means an electric utility serving more 9than 200,000 customers in this State.10    "Electrification" means any new use of electricity, 11expanded use of electricity, or change in use of electricity, 12including, but not limited to, any change in the use of 13electricity in the industrial, commercial, agricultural, 14housing, or transportation sectors.15    "Energization" and "energize" means the connection of new 16customers to the electrical grid, the establishment of 17adequate electrical capacity to provide service for a new 18customer, or upgrading electrical capacity to provide adequate 19service to an existing customer. "Energization" and "energize" 20do not include activities related to connecting electricity 21supply resources.22    "Energization time period" means the period of time that 23begins when the electric utility receives a substantially   HB3349- 2 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1complete energization project application and ends when the 2electric service associated with the project is installed and 3energized, consistent with the service obligations set forth 4in the Section 8-101 of the Public Utilities Act. 5    Section 10. Findings. The General Assembly finds the 6following:7        (1) It is the policy of the State to increase the 8    amount of electric vehicles used in the State to 1,000,000 9    by 2030. That expanded infrastructure investment will help 10    Illinois more rapidly decarbonize the transportation 11    sector. Widespread use of electric vehicles and charging 12    equipment has the potential to provide customers with fuel 13    cost savings and provide electric utility customers with 14    cost-saving benefits. Widespread use of electric vehicles 15    stimulates innovation, competition, and increased choices 16    in charging equipment and networks, attracts private 17    capital investments to the State, and creates high-quality 18    jobs in the State. Accelerating the adoption of electric 19    vehicles will drive the decarbonization of the States' 20    transportation sector. To meet these goals and federal, 21    State, regional, and local air quality and decarbonization 22    standards, plans, and regulations, a large increase in 23    both the quantity of electricity used and the functions 24    for which electricity will be used is needed.25        (2) To meet these decarbonization goals as well as   HB3349- 3 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1    federal, State, regional, and local air quality and 2    decarbonization standards, plans, and regulations, the 3    following must occur:4            (A) the State's electrical distribution systems 5        must be substantially upgraded;6            (B) new customers must promptly connect to the 7        electrical distribution system; and 8            (C) existing customers must have the customer's 9        service level promptly upgraded.10        (3) There are many reports of large housing 11    developments that are unable to be energized promptly. The 12    State has an urgent need to increase its supply of 13    housing, requiring both new electrical distribution 14    capacity and the prompt energization of new housing.15        (4) There are many reports of individual customers who 16    are unable to have their electrical service promptly 17    upgraded or energized and charging stations for 18    light-duty, medium-duty, and heavy-duty vehicles and 19    off-road vehicles, vessels, trains, and equipment that are 20    unable to be energized promptly. These delays may inhibit 21    the State's ability to meet its decarbonization goals and 22    federal, State, regional, and local air quality and 23    decarbonization standards, plans, and regulations.24        (5) To improve the speed at which energization and 25    service upgrades are performed, electric utilities that 26    distribute electricity need to do both of the following:  HB3349- 4 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1            (A) accelerate the utility's advance planning, 2        engineering, and construction of increased 3        distribution and transmission system capacity; and4            (B) advance order transformers, switchgear, and 5        other needed equipment to support acceleration of 6        activities in subparagraph (A).7        (6) Electrifying transportation and buildings can put 8    downward pressure on rates by spreading fixed costs over 9    more kilowatt-hours of usage.10        (7) Delays in energization, including service 11    upgrades, are costly both to the customers awaiting 12    service and to other customers who are deprived of the 13    downward pressure on rates.14        (8) To carry out the planning, engineering, and 15    construction of electrical distribution systems needed to 16    promptly serve customers, electric utilities that 17    distribute electricity need to recruit, train, and retain 18    an adequately sized, qualified workforce. 19        (9) The Illinois Commerce Commission needs to 20    establish target deadlines for utilities that distribute 21    electricity to energize new customers and upgrade the 22    service of existing customers.23        (10) The Illinois Commerce Commission needs to 24    establish reporting requirements for electric utilities 25    that distribute electricity to report the extent to which 26    they comply with the target deadlines and the reasons for   HB3349- 5 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1    any noncompliance. 2    Section 15. Electrical distribution system upgrades. To 3fulfill the service obligations specified in Section 8-101 of 4the Public Utilities Act, an electric utility that operates 5within the State shall:6        (1) upgrade the State's electrical distribution 7    systems as needed and in time to achieve the State's 8    decarbonization goals, and implement federal, State, 9    regional, and local air quality and decarbonization 10    standards, plans, and regulations;11        (2) conduct sufficient advance planning, engineering, 12    and construction of increased distribution of system 13    capacity by advance ordering transformers and other needed 14    equipment so that customers can be energized without 15    substantial delay;16        (3) promptly energize new customers, including by 17    ensuring that new housing, new businesses, and new 18    charging for light-duty, medium-duty, and heavy-duty 19    vehicles and off-road vehicles, vessels, trains, and 20    equipment can be used without delay caused by a failure of 21    the utility to implement energization projects;22        (4) promptly upgrade service when needed by customers;23        (5) allow customers seeking energization to choose an 24    optional flexible connection agreement, which shall 25    provide a tariffed, voluntary utility offering that   HB3349- 6 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1    requires customers to agree to specified service levels as 2    a requirement of energization or interconnection through 3    the use of demand response technology that limits the net 4    import and export of electricity at the point of common 5    coupling to remain within the rated capacity limits of a 6    customer's existing service connection or distribution 7    circuit, either on a permanent basis or to allow for 8    immediate project operations before service or 9    distribution system upgrades are completed; and10        (6) recruit, train, and retain an adequately sized and 11    qualified workforce to carry out the planning, 12    engineering, and construction of electrical distribution 13    systems needed to promptly serve customers seeking 14    energization and service upgrades without sacrificing 15    other necessary activities of the workforce. 16    Section 20. Commission requirements.17    (a) Within 180 days after the effective date of this Act, 18the Commission shall adopt rules that meet all of the 19following requirements:20        (1) Rules that establish reasonable average and 21    maximum target energization time periods. The targets 22    shall ensure that work is completed in a safe and reliable 23    manner that minimizes delay in meeting the date requested 24    by the customer for completion of the project to the 25    greatest extent possible and prioritizes work in a manner   HB3349- 7 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1    consistent with Sections 25 and 30. The targets may vary 2    depending on the complexity and magnitude of the work 3    required and uncertainties regarding the readiness of the 4    customer project needing energization. The targets may 5    also recognize any factors beyond the electric utility's 6    control.7        (2) Rules that establish requirements for an electric 8    utility to report to the Commission, at least annually, in 9    order to track and improve electric utility performance. 10    The report shall include the average, median, and standard 11    deviation time between receiving an application for 12    electrical service and energizing the electrical service, 13    explanations for energization time periods that exceed the 14    target maximum for energization projects, constraints and 15    obstacles to each type of energization, including, but not 16    limited to, funding limitations, qualified staffing 17    availability, or equipment availability, and any other 18    information requested by the Commission.19        (3) Rules that establish a procedure for customers to 20    report energization delays to the Illinois Commerce 21    Commission.22    (b) If energization time periods exceed the Commission's 23target averages or if the electric utility has a substantial 24number of energization projects that exceed the Commission's 25target maximums, the electric utility shall include in its 26report pursuant to rules adopted under paragraph (2) of   HB3349- 8 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1subsection (a) a strategy for meeting the targets in the 2future. The Commission may request modification of the 3electric utility's strategy to ensure that the electric 4utility meets targets promptly and consistent with the 5policies set forth in Section 25.6    (c) Data reported by electric utilities shall be 7anonymized or aggregated to the extent necessary to prevent 8identifying individual customers. The Commission shall require 9all reports to be publicly available.10    (d) The Commission shall require the electric utility to 11take any remedial actions necessary to achieve the 12Commission's targets, including the use of incentives or 13penalties. 14    Section 25. Electrification team; staffing.15    (a) The Commission shall require each electric utility to 16establish a dedicated electrification team that shall, at a 17minimum, do the following:18        (1) serve as a single point of contact for customers 19    throughout the entire energization process;20        (2) proactively engage with customers to understand 21    and support electrification plans; and22        (3) provide customers with consolidated and 23    coordinated access to all beneficial electrification 24    customer programs, accounts, and relevant information to 25    support electrification and the energization process.  HB3349- 9 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1    (b) The Commission shall require each electric utility to 2have adequate qualified staffing needed for the 3electrification team to achieve the policies and requirements 4of this Act.5    (c) For job classifications that have apprentice training 6requirements, the Commission shall require each electric 7utility to maintain a pipeline of apprentices sufficient to 8meet future qualified staffing needs, subject to any 9limitations based on safe staffing ratios.10    (d) As part of each report required pursuant to rules 11adopted under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 20, 12and in each general rate case application, each electric 13utility shall include a detailed analysis of its current 14qualified staffing level and future required qualified 15staffing level for each job classification needed to achieve 16the policies and requirements of this Act. 17    Section 30. Electric utility requirements. The Commission 18shall require an electric utility to do the following:19        (1) consider, in its internal distribution planning 20    process and in the development of the Multi-Year 21    Integrated Grid Plans required by Section 16-105.17 of the 22    Public Utilities Act, all of the following:23            (A) federal, State, regional, and local air 24        quality and decarbonization standards, plans, and 25        regulations;  HB3349- 10 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1            (B) the transportation and building 2        electrification policies of State law;3            (C) State agency, local agency, and local 4        government plans and requirements related to housing, 5        economic development, critical facilities, 6        transportation, and building electrification; and7            (D) load and electrification forecasts that 8        include the following:9                (I) known load and projections of load 10            conducted by State agencies and projections of 11            load that exceed forecasts conducted by State 12            agencies;13                (II) a minimum of 3 time horizons, including 14            short-term (one to 2 years), medium-term (3 to 5 15            years), and long-term (6 to 10 years) time 16            horizons;17                (III) scenarios that are consistent with 18            implementing the laws, standards, plans, and 19            regulations described in subparagraphs (A), (B), 20            and (C) of paragraph (1); 21                (IV) forecasts of peak demand at the 22            federal-level; and23                (V) a consideration of the impact of 24            distributed energy resource forecasts and, 25            specifically, local generation;26        (2) consider all of the following in its site   HB3349- 11 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1    evaluation and design process:2            (A) automated load management, managed charging, 3        and distributed energy resources to defer or mitigate 4        energization-related grid upgrades; and5            (B) if the above solutions cannot defer or 6        mitigate an upgrade, the electric utility shall 7        evaluate traditional system upgrades;8        (3) adopt and implement rules to satisfy the policies 9    set forth in Section 20 and to meet the energization time 10    periods established under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 11    of Section 20; and12        (4) submit supplemental applications between the 13    4-year cycles specified for the submission of the 14    Multi-Year Integrated Grid Plans required by Section 15    16-105.17 of the Public Utilities Act as needed to comply 16    with the energization time periods established under 17    paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 20 and to 18    accommodate the load growth necessary to implement the 19    laws, standards, plans, and regulations described in 20    subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1). 21    Section 35. Recovery of costs. The Commission shall ensure 22that electric utilities have sufficient and timely recovery of 23costs to be consistent with the findings and achieve the 24policies and requirements of this Act and Section 16-105.17 of 25the Public Utilities Act.   HB3349- 12 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1    Section 40. Safety. To ensure the safety and reliability 2of electrical infrastructure associated with charging electric 3vehicles:4        (1) The Commission, Environmental Protection Agency, 5    and Department of Transportation shall require that all 6    electric vehicle charging infrastructure and equipment 7    located on the customer side of the electrical meter that 8    is funded or authorized, in whole or in part, by those 9    State entities shall be installed by a licensed, bonded, 10    and insured electrical contractor registered in the 11    municipality where work is to be performed, and who has at 12    least one electrician on each crew, at any given time, who 13    holds an Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program 14    certification.15        (2) The Commission, Environmental Protection Agency, 16    and Department of Transportation shall require the 17    projects that are funded or authorized, in whole or in 18    part, by those State entities and that install a charging 19    port supplying 25 kilowatts or more to a vehicle to have at 20    least 25% of the total electricians working on the crew 21    for the project, at any given time, hold an Electric 22    Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program certification.23        (3) One member of each crew may be both the contractor 24    and an electrician certified by Electric Vehicle 25    Infrastructure Training Program.  HB3349- 13 -LRB104 10938 AAS 21020 b1        (4) Paragraph (1) does not apply to the following:2            (A) electric vehicle charging infrastructure 3        installed by employees of an electric utility or local 4        publicly owned electric utility; or5            (B) single-family home residential electric 6        vehicle chargers.7        (5) An electrical apprenticeship program registered 8    with United States Department of Labor that provides 9    training to apprentices and continuing education to 10    journey-level workers may provide Electric Vehicle 11    Infrastructure Training Program training with the 12    apprenticeship program's own instructors certified by an 13    Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program. The 14    Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program 15    certification exam shall be administered by the Electric 16    Vehicle Infrastructure Training Program. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.